Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2274.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5391SV (2) 91 sb/js S.F. 2274 Section 1. REPEAL. Section 724.29, Code 2026, is repealed. 1 EXPLANATION 2 The inclusion of this explanation does not constitute agreement with 3 the explanationâs substance by the members of the general assembly. 4 This bill relates to the sale or offer for sale of certain 5 firearm devices. 6 Under current law, a person who sells or offers for sale a 7 manual or power-driven trigger activating device constructed 8 and designed so that when attached to a firearm increases 9 the rate of fire of the firearm is guilty of an aggravated 10 misdemeanor. An aggravated misdemeanor is punishable by 11 confinement for no more than two years and a fine of at 12 least $855 but not more than $8,540. The bill repeals this 13 provision. 14 -1- LSB 5391SV (2) 91 sb/js 1/ 1